Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Unfair Trade Practices Act

No private right of action. —

The Wyoming Unfair Trade Practices Act does not provide for a private right of action. Wilson v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co., 795 F. Supp. 1077, 1992 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8626 (D. Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Policy provision limiting time within which action may be brought on the policy as applicable to tort action by insured against insurer, 66 ALR4th 859.

Insurer's duty, and effect of its failure, to provide insured or payee with copy of policy or other adequate documentation of its terms, 78 ALR4th 9.

Validity of state statute prohibiting health providers from the practice of waiving patients' obligation to pay health insurance deductibles or copayments, or advertising such practice, 8 ALR5th 855.

Preemption by Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act (33 USC § 901 et seq.) of state law claims for bad-faith dealing by insurer or agent of insurer, 90 ALR Fed 723.

§ 26-13-101.
Short title.

This article constitutes and may be cited as the “Unfair Trade Practices Act”.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 229, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-155, 26.1-243; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 243; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-102.
Unfair methods and deceptive acts prohibited.

No person shall engage in this state in any trade practice which is defined in this article as or is determined pursuant to this article to be an unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 229, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-158, 26.1-244; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 244; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-103.
Misrepresentations and false advertising prohibited.

No person shall:

Make, issue, circulate, or cause to be made, issued or circulated, any estimate, circular or statement misrepresenting the terms of any policy issued or to be issued or the benefits or advantages promised thereby or the dividends or share of the surplus to be received thereon;

Make any false or misleading statement as to the dividends or share of surplus previously paid on similar policies;

Make any misleading representation or any misrepresentation as to the financial condition of any insurer or as to the legal reserve system upon which any life insurer operates; or

Use any name or title of any policy or class of policies misrepresenting the true nature thereof.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 245; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-245; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to deceptive trade practices under the Wyoming Consumer Protection Act, see §

40-12-105

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-13-104.
Home office false advertising prohibited.

No person shall make in any manner in any advertising or other communication medium any advertisement, announcement or statement containing any assertion, representation or statement with respect to the business of insurance or with respect to any person in the conduct of his insurance business, which is untrue, deceptive or misleading.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 246; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-246; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-105.
“Twisting” prohibited.

No person shall make or issue, nor cause to be made or issued, any written or oral statement misrepresenting or making incomplete comparisons as to the terms, conditions or benefits contained in any policy for the purpose of inducing or attempting to induce the policyholder to lapse, forfeit, surrender, retain, exchange or convert any insurance policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 247; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-247; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-106.
False or misleading financial statements prohibited.

No person shall:

File with any supervisory or other public official or in any manner place or cause to be placed before any other person, any false statement of financial condition of an insurer with intent to deceive;

Make any false entry in any book, report or statement of any insurer with intent to deceive:

Any agent or examiner lawfully appointed to examine into its condition or into any of its affairs; or

Any public official to whom the insurer is required by law to report, or who has authority by law to examine into its condition or into any of its affairs.

With intent to deceive, willfully omit a true entry of any material fact pertaining to the insurer’s business in any book, report or statement of the insurer; or

Advertise the capital or assets of an insurer without in the same advertisement setting forth the amount of the insurer’s liabilities in equal prominence to the statement of capital and assets.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 248; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-248; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-13-107.
Defamation prohibited.

No person shall make or aid, abet or encourage the making in any manner in any communication medium of any oral or written statement which is false or maliciously critical of or derogatory to an insurer’s financial condition, or of an organization proposing to become an insurer, and which is made to injure any person engaged or proposing to engage in the insurance business.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 249; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-249; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-108.
Boycott, coercion and intimidation prohibited; exception.

No person shall enter into any agreement to commit, or by any concerted action commit, any act of boycott, coercion or intimidation resulting in unreasonable restraint of or any monopoly in any business of insurance, except that an insurer owned or controlled by an association or organization may refuse to renew a casualty or liability policy because of nonpayment of dues to the association or organization if payment of dues is a prerequisite to obtaining or continuing the insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 250; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-250; Laws 1979, ch. 147, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-109.
Unfair discrimination prohibited in regard to life insurance, annuities and disability insurance.

No person shall make or permit any unfair discrimination between individuals:

Of the same class and equal expectation of life in the rates charged for any contract of life insurance or of life annuity or in the dividends or other benefits payable thereon, or in any other of the terms and conditions of that contract;

Of the same class and of essentially the same hazard in:

The amount of premium, policy fees or rates charged for any policy or contract of disability insurance;

The benefits payable thereunder;

Any of the terms or conditions of the contract; or

Any other manner.

If a disability insurance contract provides for payment or reimbursement for services which may be legally performed by a person licensed in this state for the practice of dentistry, payment or reimbursement shall not be denied or refused solely for the reason that the services are rendered by a person licensed to practice dentistry.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 251; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-251; Laws 1971, ch. 105, § 1; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to disability insurance, see §§

26-18-101

through

26-18-136

.

For provisions as to discrimination in trade and commerce, see §§

40-4-101

through

40-4-123

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State regulation of insurer's right to classify insureds for premium or other underwriting purposes by occupation, 57 ALR4th 625.

§ 26-13-110.
Rebates and favors as to life, disability and annuity contracts prohibited.

Except as otherwise provided by law, no person shall:

Knowingly permit or offer to make or make any contract of life insurance, life annuity or disability insurance, or agreement as to that contract other than as expressed in the contract issued thereon;

Pay, allow or give or offer to pay, allow or give in any manner as inducement to the insurance or annuity:

Any rebate of premiums payable on the contract;

Any special favor or advantage in the dividends or other benefits thereon;

Any paid employment or contract for services of any kind; or

Any valuable consideration or inducement not specified in the contract.

In any manner give, sell or purchase or offer or agree to give, sell, purchase or allow as inducement to the insurance or annuity or in connection therewith, and whether or not to be specified in the policy or contract, any agreement of any form or nature promising:

Returns and profits;

Any stocks, bonds or other securities, or interest present or contingent therein or as measured thereby, of any insurer or other corporation, association or partnership; or

Any dividends or profits accrued or to accrue thereon.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 252; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-252; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (a)(ii)(D); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Insurance anti-rebate statutes: validity and construction, 90 ALR4th 213.

§ 26-13-111.
Exceptions to provisions on discrimination, rebates and stock inducements.

Nothing in W.S.

26-13-109

and

26-13-110

includes within the definition of discrimination or rebates any of the following practices:

In the case of any contract of life insurance or life annuity, paying bonuses to policyholders or otherwise abating their premiums in whole or in part out of surplus accumulated from nonparticipating insurance, provided that any such bonuses or abatement of premiums shall be fair and equitable to policyholders and for the insurer and its policyholders’ best interests;

In the case of life insurance policies issued on the industrial debit plan, making allowance to policyholders who have continuously for a specified period made premium payments directly to an office of the insurer in an amount which fairly represents the saving in collection expense;

Readjustment of the rate of premium for a group insurance policy based on the loss or expense experience thereunder, at the end of the first or any subsequent policy year of insurance thereunder, which may be made retroactive only for that policy year;

Reduction of premium rate for policies of large amount, but not exceeding savings in issuance and administration expenses reasonably attributable to those policies as compared with policies of a similar plan issued in smaller amounts;

Reduction in premium rates for life or disability insurance policies on annuity contracts on salary savings, payroll deduction, preauthorized check, bank draft or similar plans in amounts reasonably commensurate with the savings made by the use of those plans.

Nothing in W.S.

26-13-109

,

26-13-110

and

26-13-114

includes within the definition of securities as inducements to purchase insurance, the selling or offering for sale, contemporaneously with life insurance, of mutual fund shares or face amount certificates of regulated investment companies under offerings registered with the securities and exchange commission if the shares or the face amount certificates or the insurance may be purchased independently of and not contingent upon purchase of the other, at the same price and upon the same terms and conditions as if purchased independently.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 253; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-253; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-112.
Unfair discrimination, rebates and favors prohibited for property, casualty and surety insurers.

No property, casualty or surety insurer or any employee or representative thereof, and no broker or agent shall pay, allow or give, or offer to pay, allow or give, in any manner, as an inducement to insurance, or after insurance has been effected, any valuable consideration or inducement of any kind not specified or provided for in the policy, except to the extent provided for in an applicable filing with the commissioner as provided by law.

No insured named in a policy, nor any employee of the insured shall knowingly receive or accept in any manner any rebate, discount, abatement credit or reduction of premium, or any special favor, advantage, valuable consideration or inducement.

No insurer shall make or permit any unfair discrimination between insureds or property having like insuring or risk characteristics, in the premium or rates charged for insurance, in the dividends or other benefits payable on the insurance or in any other of the terms and conditions of the insurance.

Nothing in this section prohibits:

The payment of commissions or other compensation to licensed agents or brokers; or

Any insurer from allowing or returning to its participating policyholders, members or subscribers, dividends, savings or unabsorbed premium deposits.

As used in this section:

“Insurance” includes suretyship;

“Policy” includes bond.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 254; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-254; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 201, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to discrimination in trade and commerce, see §§

40-4-101

through

40-4-123

.

§ 26-13-113.
Deductible amount of collision coverage; subrogation; right to deductible.

If an insurer pays a loss claim to its insured and the insurer decides to subrogate to the insured’s loss claim, the deductible amount shall be included in the subrogated loss claim and the insurance carrier shall pay the deductible amount to its insured, without any deduction for expenses of collection, out of any recovery on the subrogated claim, before any part of the recovery is applied to any other use. If the amount of the deductible exceeds the recovery, the insurer shall pay only the amount of the recovery to the insured.

If in any arbitration of the subrogated claim two (2) or more insurers agree to offset the claims of their insureds, the right of any insured to the return of his full deductible amount shall not be abridged.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-254.1; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Conduct or inaction by insurer constituting waiver of, or creating estoppel to assert, right of subrogation, 125 ALR5th 1.

§ 26-13-114.
Securities operations and advisory board contracts as insurance inducement prohibited.

No insurer or other person shall offer, issue or deliver or permit its agents, officers or employees to offer, issue or deliver, in this or any other state, agency company stock or other capital stock, benefit certificates, shares in any common-law corporation or any advisory board contract promising returns and profits as an inducement to insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 255; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-255; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-115.
Desist orders by commissioner; appeal; violation of order.

If the commissioner finds that any person in this state, after a hearing in which the person is notified of the hearing and the charges against him, has engaged or is engaging in any act or practice defined in or prohibited under this chapter, the commissioner shall order the person to desist from the acts or practices.

The desist order is final upon expiration of the time allowed for appeals from the commissioner’s orders, if no appeal is taken, or, if there is an appeal, upon final decision of the court if the court affirms the commissioner’s order or dismisses the appeal. An intervenor in the hearing may appeal as provided in W.S.

26-2-129

.

If there is an appeal, to the extent that the commissioner’s order is affirmed, the court shall issue its own order commanding obedience to the terms of the commissioner’s order.

No order of the commissioner pursuant to this section or order of the court to enforce it in any way relieves or absolves any person affected by the order from any other liability, penalty or forfeiture under law.

Violation of any desist order is punishable as a violation of this code [title 26].

This section does not affect or prevent the imposition of any penalty provided by this code or by other law for violation of any other provision of this chapter, whether or not any hearing is called or held or any desist order issued.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 229, § 7; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-162, 26.1-256; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 256; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-116.
Procedures for undefined deceptive practices.

If the commissioner believes that any person in conducting an insurance business in this state is engaging in any method of competition or in any act or practice, not defined in this chapter, which is unfair or deceptive and that a proceeding by him in respect thereto would be in the public interest, after a hearing in which the person charged receives a notice of the hearing and of the charges against him, the commissioner shall make a written report of his findings of fact relative to the charges and serve a copy thereof upon the person and any intervenor at the hearing.

If the commissioner’s report charges a violation of this chapter and if the method of competition, act or practice is not discontinued, the commissioner, through the attorney general, at any time after service of the report, may cause an action to be instituted to enjoin and restrain the person from engaging in the method, act or practice. In the action the court may grant a restraining order or injunction upon any just terms, but the people of this state are not required to give security before the issuance of the order or injunction. If a stenographic record of the proceedings in the hearing before the commissioner is made, a certified transcript thereof including all evidence taken and the report and findings shall be received in evidence in the action.

If the commissioner’s report made under subsection (a) of this section or order on hearing made under W.S.

26-2-128

does not charge a violation of this chapter, then any intervenor in the proceedings may appeal within the time and in the manner provided in W.S. 26-2-129(b).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 257; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-257; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For provision as to appeals from the commissioner generally, see §

26-2-129

.

§ 26-13-117.
Service of process upon unauthorized insurers.

Service of all process, statements of charges and notices under this chapter upon unauthorized insurers shall be made in accordance with W.S.

26-3-122

.

The commissioner shall forward all process, statements of charges and notices to the insurer in the manner provided in W.S.

26-3-122

.

No default shall be taken against any unauthorized insurer until expiration of thirty (30) days after the date of forwarding by the commissioner under subsection (b) of this section, or date of service of process if under W.S. 26-12-203(b).

W.S. 26-12-203(d) applies to all process, statements of charges and notices under this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 258; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-258; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-118.
Favored agent or insurer.

No person shall require as a condition to loaning money upon the security of any real or personal property, or to the selling of that property under contract, that the owner of the property to whom the money is to be loaned or the vendee of the property being sold, shall place, continue or renew any policy of insurance covering the property, or covering any liability related to the property or the use thereof, through a particular insurance agent or broker or in a particular insurer. This does not prevent the lender or vendor, upon a reasonable basis, from approving or disapproving of the insurer and representative selected to underwrite the insurance, but the basis for approval or disapproval shall relate only to:

The adequacy and terms of the coverage with respect to the interest of the vendor or lender to be insured thereunder;

The financial standards to be met by the insurer; and

The ability of the insurer or representative to service the policy.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 259; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-259; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-13-119.
Interlocking ownership and management.

Any insurer may retain, invest in or acquire the whole or any part of the capital stock of any other insurer, or have a common management with any other insurer, unless the retention, investment, acquisition or common management is inconsistent with any other provision of this code [title 26], or unless by reason thereof the insurers’ business with the public is conducted in a manner which substantially lessens competition generally in the insurance business or tends to create any monopoly therein.

Any person otherwise qualified may be a director of two (2) or more insurers which are competitors, unless the effect thereof is to lessen substantially competition between insurers or tends materially to create a monopoly.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 260; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-260; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-120.
Political contributions prohibited; penalty.

No insurer shall in any manner pay or use, or offer, consent or agree to pay or use, any money or property:

For or in aid of any:

Political party, committee or organization;

Corporation or other body organized or maintained for political purposes;

Candidate for political office;

Nomination for office; or

Other political purpose; or

For the reimbursement or indemnification of any person for money or property so used.

Any officer, director, stockholder, attorney or agent of any insurer which violates this section, who participates in, aids, abets, advises or consents to any such violation, and any person who solicits or knowingly receives any money or property in violation of this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year and a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00). Any officer or director abetting in any contribution made in violation of this section is liable to the insurer for the amount so contributed.

This section does not prohibit an insurer from otherwise lawful expenditures for presentation of information to legislators relative to proposed legislation affecting the insurer.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 261; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-261; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-121.
Illegal dealing in premiums; excess charges for insurance.

No person shall willfully collect any sum as premium or charge for insurance:

If the insurance is not then provided or is not in due course to be provided, subject to the insurer’s acceptance of the risk, by an insurance policy issued by the insurer as authorized by this code [title 26];

In excess of the premium or charge applicable to the insurance, and as specified in the policy, in accordance with the applicable classifications and rates as filed with and approved by the commissioner; or

In cases where classifications, premiums or rates are not required by this code to be filed and approved, in excess of those specified in the policy and as fixed by the insurer.

Subsection (a) of this section does not prohibit the charging and collection by surplus lines brokers licensed under chapter 11 of this code of the amount of applicable state and federal taxes, examination fee and nominal service charge to cover communication expenses, in addition to the premium required by the insurer. Nor does it prohibit the charging and collection by a life insurer of amounts actually to be expended for medical examination of an applicant for life insurance or for reinstatement of a life insurance policy.

Each violation of this section is punishable under W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 262; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-262; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Quoted

in

Mortgage Guar. Ins. Corp. v. Langdon, 634 P.2d 509,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1981).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Revocation or suspension of insurance agent's license for withholding or misappropriation of premiums, 17 ALR4th 1106.

§ 26-13-122.
Fictitious groups prohibited.

No authorized or unauthorized insurer shall make available, through any rating plan or form, property, casualty or surety insurance to any firm, corporation or association of individuals at any preferred rate or premium based upon any fictitious grouping of the firm, corporation or association.

No form or plan of insurance covering any group or combination of persons or risks shall be written or delivered within or outside this state to cover persons or risks in this state at any preferred rate or on any form other than as offered to persons not in the group or combination and to the public generally, unless the form, plan of insurance and the rates or premiums to be charged therefor have been submitted to and approved by the commissioner as being not unfairly discriminatory, and as not otherwise being in conflict with subsection (a) of this section or with chapter 14 of this code [title 26] to the extent that chapter 14 is applicable thereto.

This section does not apply to life insurance, disability insurance or annuity contracts.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 263; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-263; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-13-123.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 175, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 264, related to prohibited relations with mortuaries and prescribed a penalty.

§ 26-13-124.
Unfair claims settlement practices.

A person is considered to be engaging in an unfair method of competition and unfair and deceptive act or practice in the business of insurance if that person commits or performs with such frequency as to indicate a general business practice any of the following unfair claims settlement practices:

Misrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy provisions relating to coverages at issue;

Failing to acknowledge and act reasonably promptly upon communications with respect to claims arising under insurance policies;

Failing to adopt and implement reasonable standards for the prompt investigation of claims arising under insurance policies;

Refusing to pay claims without conducting a reasonable investigation based upon all available information;

Failing to affirm or deny coverage of claims within a reasonable time after proof of loss statements have been completed;

Not attempting in good faith to effectuate prompt, fair and equitable settlements of claims in which liability has become reasonably clear;

Compelling insureds to institute litigation to recover amounts due under an insurance policy by offering substantially less than the amounts ultimately recovered in actions brought by such insureds;

Attempting to settle a claim for less than the amount to which a reasonable person would have believed he was entitled by reference to written or printed advertising material accompanying or made part of an application;

Attempting to settle claims on the basis of an application which was altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the insured;

Making claims payments to insureds or beneficiaries not accompanied by a statement setting forth the coverage under which the payments are being made;

Making known to insureds or claimants a policy of appealing from arbitration awards in favor of insureds or claimants for the purpose of compelling them to accept settlements or compromises less than the amount awarded in arbitration;

Delaying the investigation or payment of claims by requiring an insured, claimant or the physician of either to submit a preliminary claim report and then requiring the subsequent submission of formal proof of loss forms, both of which submissions contain substantially the same information;

Failing to promptly settle claims, where liability has become reasonably clear, under one (1) portion of the insurance policy coverage in order to influence settlements under other portions of the insurance policy coverage;

Failing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation of the basis in the insurance policy in relation to the facts or applicable law for denial of a claim or for the offer of a compromise settlement;

Denying or failing to timely pay disability insurance claims for medically necessary services, procedures or supplies as required by W.S.

26-40-201

;

Failing to comply with the external review procedures required by W.S.

26-40-201

; or

Failing to pay a claim after an external review organization has declared such claim to be a benefit covered under the terms of the insurance policy.

History.

Laws 1986, ch. 43, § 1; 2009, ch. 104, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (a)(xv) through (a)(xvii) and made a related change.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 104, §§ 3 and 4 provide:

“Section 3. This act applies to disability insurance policies and certificates of coverage issued, renewed, delivered or issued for delivery in this state on or after July 1, 2010.

“Section 4. The insurance commissioner may adopt rules and regulations implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

No good faith duty nor private action for third party claimants. —

Third party claimants have no direct cause of action against an insurer for bad faith under this section, even in the context of intra-family suits, because the duty of good faith and fair dealing runs only from the insurer to the insured. Nor may they assert a private cause of action, since no implied private actions exist under this section. Herrig v. Herrig, 844 P.2d 487,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

For article, “Understanding the Tort of Third-Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: Western Casualty & Surety Company v. Fowler Revisited,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 635 (1991).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability insurance: third party's right of action for insurer's bad-faith tactics designed to delay payment of claim, 62 ALR4th 1113.

Liability insurer's postloss conduct as waiver of, or estoppel to assert, “no-action” clause, 68 ALR4th 389.

Waiver or estoppel of insurer on basis of statements or omissions in promotional, illustrative, or explanatory materials given to insured, 63 ALR5th 427.

What constitutes bad faith on part of insurer rendering it liable for statutory penalty imposed for bad faith in failure to pay, or delay in paying, insured's claim-Particular conduct of insurer, 115 ALR5th 589.

What constitutes bad faith on part of insurer rendering it liable for statutory penalty imposed for bad faith in failure to pay, or delay in paying, insured's claim-Particular grounds for denial of claim: matters relating to policy, 116 ALR5th 247.

What constitutes bad faith on part of insurer rendering it liable for statutory penalty imposed for bad faith in failure to pay, or delay in paying, insured's claim-Particular grounds for denial of claim: risks, causes, and extent of loss, injury, disability, or death,123 ALR5th 259.

§ 26-13-125.
Certificates of insurance.

No person shall prepare, issue or knowingly request the issuance of a certificate of insurance unless the form has been filed and approved in accordance with W.S.

26-15-110

. No person shall alter or modify a certificate of insurance form unless the alteration or modification has been filed and approved in accordance with chapter 15 of this code.

The commissioner shall disapprove the use of, or prohibit the use of, a certificate of insurance form filed under this section if the certificate of insurance form:

Is unfair, misleading or deceptive;

Violates public policy; or

Fails to comply with this section or any other law of this state.

The forms used for a certificate of insurance for surplus lines policies issued pursuant to the nonadmitted insurance law, W.S.

26-11-101

et seq., are not subject to the approval requirements of W.S.

26-15-110

. Certificates issued for surplus lines insurance policies shall use either:

A form approved for the policy by the insurer’s home state; or

A standard form used by the issuing insurer if there is no relevant form approved by the home state.

Each certificate of insurance shall contain the following or similar statement: “This certificate of insurance is issued as a matter of information only and confers no rights upon the certificate holder. Subject to W.S. 26-13-125(e), this certificate does not alter, amend or extend the coverage, terms, exclusions and conditions afforded by the policies referenced herein.”

No person shall demand or request the issuance of a certificate of insurance or other document, record or correspondence that the person knows contains any false or misleading information or that purports to affirmatively or negatively alter, amend or extend the coverage provided by the policy of insurance to which the certificate makes reference.

The provisions of this section shall apply to all certificate holders, third party certificate administrators, policy holders, insurers, insurance producers and certificate of insurance forms issued as evidence of property or casualty insurance coverages on property, operations or risks located in this state, regardless of where the certificate holder, policy holder, insurer or insurance producer is located.

A certificate of insurance is not a policy of insurance and does not affirmatively or negatively alter, amend or extend the coverage afforded by the policy to which the certificate of insurance makes reference. A certificate of insurance shall not confer to a certificate holder any new or additional rights beyond what the referenced policy or insurance provides. Any coverage or policy limits listed on the certificate of insurance shall accurately reflect policy limits.

No certificate of insurance shall contain references to contracts other than the underlying contracts of insurance, including construction or service contracts. Notwithstanding any requirement, term or condition of any contract or other document with respect to which a certificate of insurance may be issued or may pertain, the insurance afforded by the referenced policy of insurance is subject to all the terms, exclusions and conditions of the policy itself.

A person is entitled to receive notice of cancellation, nonrenewal or any material change or any similar notice concerning a policy of insurance only if the person has notice rights under the terms of the policy or any endorsement to the policy. The terms and conditions of the notice, including the required timing of the notice, are governed by the policy of insurance or endorsement and may not be altered by a certificate of insurance.

Any certificate of insurance or any other document, record or correspondence prepared, issued or requested in violation of this section shall be null and void and of no force and effect.

As used in this section:

“Certificate” or “certificate of insurance” means any document or instrument, no matter how titled or described, which is prepared or issued as evidence of property or casualty insurance coverage. “Certificate” or “certificate of insurance” shall not include a policy of insurance, a certificate issued to a policyholder under a group master policy, an insurance binder, a policy endorsement, and automobile insurance identification card, or a certificate prepared or issued pursuant to any federal law, rule or regulation or any other law, rule or regulation of this state, in which the specific content and form of the certificate is enumerated therein;

“Certificate holder” means any person, other than a policyholder, who requests, obtains or possesses a certificate of insurance;

“Group master policy” means an insurance policy that provides coverage to eligible persons on a group basis through a group insurance program;

“Policyholder” means a person who has contracted with a property or casualty insurer for insurance coverage.

History:

2014 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective date. —

Laws 2014, ch. 113, § 2, makes the
act effective July 1, 2014.